test/src/morphology/N-radio_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - radio: # Noun 90 'eng /est raadio/fin' - full paradigm
     radio+N+Sg+Nom: radio
     radio+N+Sg+Gen: radio
     radio+N+Sg+Par: radio
     radio+N+Sg+Dat: radion
     radio+N+Sg+Ins: radioks
     radio+N+Sg+Ill: [radio, radioz]
     radio+N+Sg+Ela: radiost
     radio+N+Pl+Nom: radiod
     radio+N+Pl+Gen: radiod
     radio+N+Pl+Par: radiodi
     radio+N+Pl+Dat: radiodõn
     radio+N+Pl+Ins: radiodõks
     radio+N+Pl+Ill: radioiž
     radio+N+Pl+Ela: radioist
